Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-904
Deeds; filing without stamps; prohibited; removal of stamps from deed; prohibited.

The register of deeds shall accept no deeds, instruments, or writings for conveyance of any lands, tenements, or other realty sold unless the stamps as are provided for in section 76-901 are attached and canceled. The stamps shall not be subsequently removed from the deed.

Laws 1965, c. 463, § 4, p. 1474.